Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 7. Enhanced Public Safety Telephone Services Act.
§ 56-484.17.
Wireless E-911 Fund; uses of Fund; enforcement; audit required.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Wireless E-911 Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund
and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Except as provided in § 44-146.18:5, moneys
in the Fund shall be used for the purposes stated in subsections C and D. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the
Tax Commissioner or the State Coordinator of Emergency Management.

Each CMRS provider and each CMRS reseller shall collect a monthly wireless E-911 surcharge of $0.82 from each of its customers whose place of primary use is within the Commonwealth. However, no surcharge shall be imposed on federal, state and local government
agencies. A payment equal to all wireless E-911 surcharges shall be remitted within 30 days to the Department of Taxation. The Department of Taxation, after subtracting its direct costs of administration, shall deposit all remitted
wireless E-911 surcharges into the state treasury. The Comptroller shall as soon as practicable deposit such moneys into the Fund. Each CMRS provider and CMRS reseller may retain an amount equal to three percent of the wireless
E-911 surcharges collected to defray the costs of collecting the surcharges. State and local taxes shall not apply to any wireless E-911 surcharge collected from customers. Surcharges collected from customers shall be subject to
the provisions of the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (4 U.S.C. § 116 et seq., as amended).The CMRS provider and CMRS reseller shall collect the surcharge through regular periodic billing.

Sixty percent of the Wireless E-911 Fund shall be distributed on a monthly basis to the PSAPs according to each PSAP’s average pro rata distribution from the Wireless E-911 Fund for fiscal years 2007-2012, taking into account any funding adjustments made
pursuant to subsection E. On or before July 1, 2018, and every five years thereafter, the Department of Taxation shall recalculate the distribution percentage for each PSAP based on the population and call load data of the PSAP
for the previous five fiscal years, which data shall continue to be received by the Board and then reported to the Department of Taxation. The distribution from the Wireless E-911 Fund shall be made on a monthly basis to the PSAPs
according to such distribution percentage beginning July 1 of such fiscal year.

The remaining 40 percent of the Fund shall be distributed to PSAPs or on behalf of PSAPs based on grant requests received by the Board each fiscal year. The Board shall establish criteria for receiving and making grants from the Fund, including procedures
for determining the amount of a grant and payment schedule. The Board shall give the highest priority to grants that support the regional or multijurisdictional deployment and sustainment of NG9-1-1, and it shall give secondary
priority to grants that support the deployment and sustainment of (i) NG9-1-1 in a single jurisdiction and (ii) in-building repeaters that improve public safety radio coverage within buildings with impaired radio coverage. If requested
by an originating service provider, the Board shall execute a contract to reimburse that originating service provider for its costs incurred to deliver 9-1-1 calls to the ESInet points of interconnection. The Board shall ensure
that cost is minimized while still achieving necessary 9-1-1 service and ESInet objectives. The Board may retain some or all of this uncommitted funding for an identified 9-1-1 funding need or for a reserve balance pursuant to
a reserve balance policy adopted by the Board.

After the end of each fiscal year, on a schedule adopted by the Board, the Board shall audit the grant funding received by all recipients to ensure it was utilized in accordance with the grant requirements. Each funding recipient shall provide such verification
of such costs as may be requested by the Board. Any overpayment shall be refunded to the Board or credited to payments during the then-current fiscal year, on such schedule as the Board shall determine. If payments are less than
the actual costs reported, the Board may include the additional funding in the then-current fiscal year.

The Auditor of Public Accounts, or his legally authorized representatives, shall audit the Wireless E-911 Fund as determined necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts. The cost of such audit shall be borne by the Board and be payable from the Wireless
E-911 Fund, as appropriate. The Board shall furnish copies of the audits to the Governor, the Public Safety Subcommittees of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations and the House Committee on Appropriations, and the
Virginia State Crime Commission.

The special tax authorized by §

58.1-1730

shall not be imposed on consumers of CMRS.

History.
2000, c. 1064; 2001, c. 529; 2002, c. 68; 2003, c. 341; 2004, c. 167; 2005, c. 942; 2006, cc. 739, 780; 2010, cc. 466, 566; 2011, cc. 162, 630; 2012, cc. 25, 165, 672; 2017, cc. 22, 260; 2018, cc. 57, 307, 532, 533; 2020,
c. 423; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Cross references.

As to the establishment of the Division of Public Safety Communications, see § 44-146.18:5.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 68, cl. 2, provides: “That if a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on the merits that is based on federal law, is no longer subject to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements of the Mobile
Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. § 116 et seq., as amended, adopted by this act, then all amendments enacted by this act are declared to be invalid and have no legal effect as of the date of entry of such judgment. Further,
as of the date of entry of such judgment, all amendments enacted by this act shall automatically be repealed and the law in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act, as it pertained to the sourcing of local mobile
telecommunications services, shall be effective.”

Acts 2002, c. 68, cl. 4, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be applicable to customer bills issued after August 1, 2002.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4, provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6, provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8, provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9, provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

Acts 2010, cc. 466 and 566, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2011.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 529 added subsection I.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 68, in subsection B, substituted “place of primary use” for “billing address” in the first sentence, substituted “thirty” for “30” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 341 in subsection B, substituted “30” for “thirty”, “equal to” for “not to exceed”, and added the second paragraph; and in subsection G, substituted “90” for “ninety.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 167, in subsection D, deleted “in four equal payments” following “CMRS provider” and added “or on an alternate schedule approved by the Board” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “actually incurred costs have been
paid” for “qualifying payments have been made” in the last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 942 substituted “Chief Information Officer of the Commonwealth” for “Director” in the last sentence of subsection A; rewrote subsection B; in subsection D, substituted “may be included in future funding requests to the Board”
for “shall be carried forward for payment during the next calendar quarter” in the next-to-last sentence and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “Such carry-forward process shall continue until all actually incurred costs
have been paid”; in subsection E, substituted “After the end of each fiscal year, on a schedule adopted by the Board” for “During the period July 1 through September 30 of each year” in the first sentence and added the last sentence;
in subsection F, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection A” in two places and divided the former subsection into the present first and last sentences by substituting “any PSAP or CMRS costs submitted after the start of the fiscal
year shall not be considered by the Board. Qualifying” for “qualifying”; and substituted “subsection” for “section” in the last sentence of subsection G.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 739 rewrote the section.

The 2006 amendment by c. 780, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (4 U.S.C. § 116 et seq., as amended)” for “subsection K of §

58.1-3812

” in the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection B; and substituted “§

58.1-1730

” for “§

58.1-3813.1

” in subsection F. See Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 466 and 566, effective January 1, 2011, are identical, and rewrote subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 162, in subsection B, substituted “to the Department of Taxation” for “to the Board for deposit in the Fund” in the third sentence, and added the fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2011 amendment by c. 630, in subsection C, in the second sentence, substituted “recalculate” for “calculate,” “annually before” for “at” and “one or more of the previous fiscal years” for “the previous fiscal year and implement this percentage by
October 1 of the current year,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 25 and 165 are identical, and inserted “Tax Commissioner or the” near the end of subsection A, divided former subsection C into present subsections C and D and redesignated the following subsections accordingly, and rewrote
present subsection C.

The 2012 amendment by c. 672, in subsection D, substituted “provide payment to CMRS providers of wireless E-911” for “provide full payment to CMRS providers of all wireless E-911” in the first sentence, and deleted the fourth and fifth sentences, and
added “or for a reserve balance pursuant to a reserve balance policy adopted by the Board” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 22 and 260 are identical, and substituted “July 1, 2018” for “July 1, 2017” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 57 and 307 are identical, and in the first sentence of subsection F, deleted “annually” preceding “audit” and inserted “as determined necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts.”

The 2018 amendments by cc. 532 and 533 are identical, and in subsection C, deleted “Beginning July 1, 2012” at the beginning, and substituted “based on the population” for “based on the cost”; rewrote subsections D and E; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 423 substituted “§ 44-146.18:5” for “§

2.2-2031

” and “State Coordinator of Emergency Management” for “Chief Information Officer of the Commonwealth” in subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 248, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, substituted “monthly wireless E-911 surcharge of $0.82” for “wireless E-911 surcharge”; and in subsection D, substituted “The Board shall give the highest priority to
grants that support the regional or multijurisdictional deployment and sustainment of NG9-1-1, and it shall give secondary priority to grants that support the deployment and sustainment of (i) NG9-1-1 in a single jurisdiction and (ii)
in-building repeaters that improve public safety radio coverage within buildings with impaired radio coverage” for “however, priority shall be given to grants that support the deployment and sustainment of NG9-1-1.”

§ 56-484.17:1.
Collection of prepaid wireless E-911 charge at point of sale; rate established.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Dealer” means a person who sells prepaid CMRS to an end user.“Department” means the Department of Taxation.“End user” means a person who purchases prepaid CMRS in a retail transaction.“Prepaid
CMRS” means CMRS that allows a caller to dial 911 to access the 911 system, which CMRS service is required to be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known
amount.“Prepaid wireless E-911 charge” means the charge that is required to be collected by a dealer from an end user in the amount established under subsection B.“Retail transaction” means the purchase of prepaid CMRS from a dealer
for any purpose other than resale. If more than one item or article of prepaid CMRS is purchased by an end user, then each item or article purchased shall be deemed to be a separate retail transaction.

The prepaid wireless E-911 charge:

Shall be $0.55 per retail transaction.

Shall be collected by the dealer from the end user with respect to each retail transaction occurring in the Commonwealth. The amount of the prepaid wireless E-911 charge shall be either separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document
that is provided to the end user by the dealer or otherwise disclosed by the dealer to the end user. For purposes of this subdivision, a retail transaction that is effected in person by an end user at a business location
of the dealer shall be treated as occurring in the Commonwealth if that business location is in the Commonwealth, and any other retail transaction shall be treated as occurring in the Commonwealth if treated as occurring
in the Commonwealth for purposes of the Virginia Retail Sales and Use Tax Act (§

58.1-600

et seq.).

Is the liability of the end user and not of the dealer or of any CMRS provider, except that the dealer shall be liable to remit to the Department all prepaid wireless E-911 charges that the dealer collects from end users as provided in subsection E, including
all prepaid wireless E-911 charges that the dealer is deemed to have collected in cases in which the charge has not been separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the end user by the
dealer.

The amount of the prepaid wireless E-911 charge that is collected by a dealer from an end user shall not be included in the base for measuring any fee, tax, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by the Commonwealth, any political subdivision of the
Commonwealth, or any intergovernmental agency.

Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the charge imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected by the Tax Commissioner and shall be implemented, enforced, and collected in the same manner as retail sales and use taxes are implemented, enforced,
and collected under the Virginia Retail Sales and Use Tax Act (§

58.1-600

et seq.). However, as provided in subdivision B 3, the prepaid wireless E-911 charge shall be the liability of the end user and not of the dealer or of any CMRS provider, except that the dealer shall be liable to
remit to the Department all prepaid wireless E-911 charges that the dealer collects from end users. A dealer shall be permitted to deduct and retain five percent of prepaid wireless E-911 charges that are collected by the dealer
from end users if such charges were not delinquent at the time of remittance to the Department. Nothing herein shall be construed or interpreted as limiting or restricting the discount provided under §

58.1-622

with regard to prepaid CMRS that is taxable under the Virginia Retail Sales and Use Tax Act.The Department, after subtracting its direct costs of administration, shall deposit all remitted prepaid wireless E-911
charges into the state treasury. The Comptroller shall as soon as practicable deposit such moneys into the Wireless E-911 Fund for use by the Board in accordance with the purposes permitted by this article.

The Department shall develop and publish guidelines implementing the provisions of this section and shall update the guidelines as deemed necessary by the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall notify every dealer holding a certificate of registration
under §

58.1-613

when the guidelines and any updates are published. The development and publication of the guidelines shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).Among other items, the guidelines shall include provisions exempting small dealers, as defined solely by the Department, from the otherwise mandatory requirement under this section to disclose the prepaid
wireless E-911 charge to the end user. The guidelines shall define a “small dealer” based, in part or in whole, upon the extent to which the dealer sells prepaid CMRS.

The provisions of this section shall apply to retail transactions occurring on or after January 1, 2011.

History.
2010, cc. 466, 566; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 466 and 566, cl. 3 provides: “That in lieu of collecting the prepaid wireless E-911 charge from end users as provided under this act, a dealer may absorb such charges and shall become solely liable for the same on all sales of prepaid CMRS
in retail transactions, provided that the Tax Commissioner has granted to the dealer a written authorization to absorb the prepaid wireless E-911 charge on all sales made by the dealer of prepaid CMRS in retail transactions and such
authorization provides a temporary period for which the dealer shall be permitted to absorb the prepaid wireless E-911 charge. Nothing herein shall be construed or interpreted as allowing the dealer to advertise or hold out to the
public, directly or indirectly, that (i) the dealer will absorb all or any part of such charges or (ii) he will relieve the end user of payment of the same.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 248, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “$0.55” for “$0.50” in subdivision B 1.

§ 56-484.18.
Designation of official State Police access number; blocking caller identification prohibited.

Telephone number #77 is hereby designated as an official access number for wireless telephone usage in the Commonwealth for access to designated offices of the Department of State Police and shall be used solely for official business.

No caller shall block caller identification or other essential information on calls made to telephone number #77. Where technically feasible, wireline and wireless telephone providers shall provide calling party number identification for all wireless
#77 calls. Any communications services provider, as defined in §

58.1-647

, including mobile service, in this Commonwealth shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission resulting from rendering such service with or without charge related to #77 calls unless such act
or omission was the result of such service provider’s gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.
2000, c. 771; 2006, c. 780.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2000 act having been 56-484.12.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4, provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6, provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8, provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9, provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 780, effective January 1, 2007, substituted “communications services provider, as defined in §

58.1-647

” for “provider of telecommunications service, as defined in §

58.1-3812

” in the third sentence of subsection B. See Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9.